North Dakota, session 69, HB1318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 28-01.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Pesticide labeling - Duty to warn - Defenses .
Notwithstanding any other provision in this title, any pesticide registered with the agriculture
commissioner under chapter 4.1 - 33 or the United States environmental protection agency under the
Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act [61 Stat. 163; 7 U.S.C. 136 et seq.] which displays
a label approved by the United States environmental protection agency in registering the pesticide,
displays a label consistent with the most recent human health assessment performed under the Federal
Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act [61 Stat. 163; 7 U.S.C. 136 et seq.], or displays a label
consistent with the United States environmental protection agency carcinogenicity classification for the
pesticide under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act [61 Stat. 163; 7 U.S.C. 136
e t seq.] is sufficient to satisfy any requirement for warning or labeling regarding health or safety under
this chapter and any other provision or doctrine of state law concerning the duty to warn or label, or any
other common law duty to warn.

H. B. NO. 1318 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1318.
House Vote: Yeas 51 Nays 40 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 29 Nays 18 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State